Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3254.01
Improvement project; determination of special benefits; effect.

When determining the apportionment of benefits under section 2-3254, the board shall also make a determination as to what portion of the project will result in special benefits to lands and property and such determination, if not appealed as provided in section 2-3255, shall be conclusive as establishing the authority of the district to levy special assessments and issue bonds and warrants for such project.

Laws 1981, LB 388, § 2.